csv2fst/yaml_output/VAI_CNJ_m.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg: minongwaamaan
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg: minongwaaman
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl: minongwaamaang
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl: minongwaamang
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl: minongwaameg
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx: minongwaang
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx: minongwaamowaad
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv: minongwaaminid
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlObv: minongwaaminid
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X: minongwaaming
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg: minongwaanziwaan
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg: minongwaanziwan
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl: minongwaanziwaang
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl: minongwaanziwang
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl: minongwaanziweg
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx: minongwaanzig
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx: minongwaanzigwaa
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv: minongwaanzinig
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlObv: minongwaanzinig
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X: minongwaanzing
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg: minongwaamaambaan
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg: minongwaamamban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl: minongwaamaangiban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl: minongwaamangiban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl: minongwaamegiban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx: minongwaangiban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx: minongwaamowaapan
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv: minongwaaminipan
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlObv: minongwaaminipan
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X: minongwaamingiban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg: minongwaanziwaambaan
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg: minongwaanziwamban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl: minongwaanziwaangiban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl: minongwaanziwangiban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl: minongwaanziwegiban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx: minongwaanzigoban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx: minongwaanzigwaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv: minongwaanzinigoban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlObv: minongwaanzinigoban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X: minongwaanzingiban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg: minongwaamowaanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg: minongwaamowanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl: minongwaamowaangen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl: minongwaamowangen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl: minongwaamowegwen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx: minongwaamogwen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx: minongwaamowaagwen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv: minongwaaminigwen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlObv: minongwaaminigwen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X: minongwaamowiingen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg: minongwaanziiwaanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg: minongwaanziiwanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl: minongwaanziiwaangen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl: minongwaanziiwangen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl: minongwaanziiwegwen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx: minongwaanziigwen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx: minongwaanziiwaagwen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv: minongwaanziinigwen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlObv: minongwaanziinigwen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X: minongwaanziiwiingen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+1Sg: minongwaamowaambaanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+2Sg: minongwaamowambanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+Excl: minongwaamowaangibanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+Incl: minongwaamowangibanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+2Pl: minongwaamowegibanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgProx: minongwaamogobanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx: minongwaamowaagobanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgObv: minongwaaminigobanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlObv: minongwaaminigobanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+X: minongwaamowiingibanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+1Sg: minongwaanziiwaambaanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+2Sg: minongwaanziiwambanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+Excl: minongwaanziiwaangibanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+Incl: minongwaanziiwangibanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+2Pl: minongwaanziiwegibanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgProx: minongwaanziigobanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlProx: minongwaanziiwaagobanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgObv: minongwaanziinigobanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlObv: minongwaanziinigobanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+X: minongwaanziiwiingibanen
